test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-hiibwlwma56_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `hiibõlõma: # Verb (56) `hiibõlõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hiibõlõma+V+Inf/mA: hiibõlõma
     hiibõlõma+V+Inf: hiibõldaq
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+PrfPrc: hiibõlnuq
     hiibõlõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: hiibõld

     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hiibõlõ
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [hiibõlõt, hiibõlõdõq]
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiibõlõs
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hiibõlõmiq
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [hiibõlõtiq, hiibõlõdõq]
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hiibõlõsõq
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: hiibõlõ
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hiibõli
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [hiibõlit, hiibõlidõq]
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hiibõli
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: hiibõlimiq
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [hiibõlitiq, hiibõlidõq]
     hiibõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [hiibõliq, hiibõlivaq]

     hiibõlõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiibõldas

     hiibõlõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hiibõlõv

     hiibõlõma+V+Jus: hiibõlguq
